Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-314
Stock; enforced withdrawal; notice of intention; contents.

The association shall without delay, upon so retiring shares by order of its board of directors, send a written notice to each person shown by the books of the association to be an owner of shares thus retired, mailed to such person's last-known address, which notice shall contain information of the retirement of the shares and of the number of the certificate representing said shares, and of the amount to be paid to such owner upon delivery to the association of said certificate.

Laws 1941, c. 12, § 1, p. 85;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-304;

R.S.1943, § 8-314.